Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 49. EDUCATION--PUBLIC

CHAPTER 2. TEXAS A & M UNIVERSITY

Art. 2613a-10. CONVEYANCE OF LAND FOR LIVESTOCK INSECTS AND TOXICOLOGY LABORATORY AND COTTON DISEASE RESEARCH FACILITY.

Section 1. The Board of Directors of Texas A & M University is authorized to convey to the United States a sufficient quantity of land on, or conveniently located in reference to, the campus of Texas A & M University for the construction thereon, and for incidental use of said land, at the expense of the United States, of a livestock insects and toxicology laboratory, and a cotton disease research facility.

Sec. 2. The said Board of Directors is authorized to convey to the United States a sufficient quantity of land from the Texas Agricultural Experiment Station at Lubbock for the construction thereon, and for incidental use of said land, at the expense of the United States, of a ginning research facility.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., p. 308, ch. 140, eff. May 13, 1965.

Art. 2615d-1. KIMBLE COUNTY ADJUNCT; TRANSFER TO TEXAS TECH UNIVERSITY. The Kimble County Adjunct of Texas A & M University, the land on which it is located, and its buildings, equipment, and facilities are transferred to Texas Tech University for use in connection with the educational activities of Texas Tech University as determined by its board of regents, provided, however, that Texas A & M University shall have the right and duty to complete its current pecan research on the property being transferred.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1905, ch. 570, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.